New Mexico, session 2026, SB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 64-1-22 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1965, Chapter 34, Section 2) is amended to read: "64-1-22. UNLAWFUL INTERFERENCE WITH THE FLIGHT AND OPERATION OF AN AIRCRAFT--PENALTIES.--[Any] A. Unlawful interference with the flight and operation of an aircraft consists of a person discharging a firearm or setting in flight any missile, projectile, laser or object intended to strike, interfere with or collide with any flying aircraft [shall be guilty of] or aviation support system. Whoever commits unlawful interference with the flight and operation of an aircraft is guilty of a fourth degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. B. As used in this section, "laser" means a device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic radiation by stimulated emission that emits a beam designed to be used by the operator as a pointer or highlighter to indicate, mark or identify a specific position, place, item or object." SECTION 2. Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 216, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read: "31-18-15. SENTENCING AUTHORITY--NONCAPITAL FELONIES--BASIC SENTENCES AND FINES--PAROLE AUTHORITY--MERITORIOUS DEDUCTIONS.-- A. As used in a statute that establishes a noncapital felony, the following defined felony classifications and associated basic sentences of imprisonment are as follows: FELONY CLASSIFICATION           BASIC SENTENCE first degree felony resulting in the death of a child                      life imprisonment first degree felony for aggravated criminal sexual penetration                     life imprisonment first degree felony             eighteen years imprisonment second degree felony resulting in the death of a human being                   eighteen years imprisonment second degree felony for a sexual offense against a child                           fifteen years imprisonment second degree felony for sexual exploitation of children                        twelve years imprisonment second degree felony            nine years imprisonment third degree felony resulting in the death of a human being   six years imprisonment third degree felony for a sexual offense against a child                           six years imprisonment third degree felony for sexual exploitation of children        eleven years imprisonment third degree felony             three years imprisonment fourth degree felony for sexual exploitation of children                        ten years imprisonment fourth degree felony for unlawful interference with the flight and operation of an aircraft                     five years imprisonment fourth degree felony            eighteen months imprisonment. B. The appropriate basic sentence of imprisonment shall be imposed upon a person convicted and sentenced pursuant to Subsection A of this section, unless the court alters the sentence pursuant to the provisions of the Criminal Sentencing Act. C. A period of parole shall be imposed only for felony convictions wherein a person is sentenced to imprisonment of more than one year, unless the parties to a proceeding agree that a period of parole should be imposed. If a period of parole is imposed, the court shall include in the judgment and sentence of each person convicted and sentenced to imprisonment in a corrections facility designated by the corrections department authority for a period of parole to be served in accordance with the provisions of Section 31-21-10 NMSA 1978. If imposed, the period of parole shall be deemed to be part of the sentence of the convicted person in addition to the basic sentence imposed pursuant to Subsection A of this section together with alterations, if any, pursuant to the provisions of the Criminal Sentencing Act. D. When a court imposes a sentence of imprisonment pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15.1, 31-18-16 or 31-18-17 NMSA 1978 and suspends or defers the basic sentence of imprisonment provided pursuant to the provisions of Subsection A of this section, the period of parole shall be served in accordance with the provisions of Section 31-21-10 NMSA 1978 for the degree of felony for the basic sentence for which the inmate was convicted. For the purpose of designating a period of parole, a court shall not consider that the basic sentence of imprisonment was suspended or deferred and that the inmate served a period of imprisonment pursuant to the provisions of the Criminal Sentencing Act. E. The court may, in addition to the imposition of a basic sentence of imprisonment, impose a fine not to exceed: (1) for a first degree felony resulting in the death of a child, seventeen thousand five hundred dollars ($17,500); (2) for a first degree felony for aggravated criminal sexual penetration, seventeen thousand five hundred dollars ($17,500); (3) for a first degree felony, fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); (4) for a second degree felony resulting in the death of a human being, twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500); (5) for a second degree felony for a sexual offense against a child, twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500); (6) for a second degree felony for sexual exploitation of children, five thousand dollars ($5,000); (7) for a second degree felony, ten thousand dollars ($10,000); (8) for a third degree felony resulting in the death of a human being, five thousand dollars ($5,000); (9) for a third degree felony for a sexual offense against a child, five thousand dollars ($5,000); (10) for a third degree felony for sexual exploitation of children, five thousand dollars ($5,000); (11) for a third or fourth degree felony, five thousand dollars ($5,000); [or] (12) for a fourth degree felony for sexual exploitation of children, five thousand dollars ($5,000); or (13) for a fourth degree felony for unlawful interference with the flight and operation of an aircraft, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). F. When the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment for a felony offense, the court shall indicate whether or not the offense is a serious violent offense as defined in Section 33-2-34 NMSA 1978. The court shall inform an offender that the offender's sentence of imprisonment is subject to the provisions of Sections 33-2-34, 33-2-36, 33-2-37 and 33-2-38 NMSA 1978. If the court fails to inform an offender that the offender's sentence is subject to those provisions or if the court provides the offender with erroneous information regarding those provisions, the failure to inform or the error shall not provide a basis for a writ of habeas corpus. G. No later than October 31 of each year, the New Mexico sentencing commission shall provide a written report to the secretary of corrections, all New Mexico criminal court judges, the administrative office of the district attorneys and the chief public defender. The report shall specify the average reduction in the sentence of imprisonment for serious violent offenses and nonviolent offenses, as defined in Section 33-2-34 NMSA 1978, due to meritorious deductions earned by prisoners during the previous fiscal year pursuant to the provisions of Sections 33-2-34, 33-2-36, 33-2-37 and 33-2-38 NMSA 1978. The corrections department shall allow the commission access to documents used by the department to determine earned meritorious deductions for prisoners." SECTION 3. REPEAL.--Section 64-1-23 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1965, Chapter 34, Section 3) is repealed. - 7 -